Arkansas, session 2025, HB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-10-802 is amended to read as follows:
20-10-802. Exceptions from licensing requirements.
The following persons are not required to be licensed under § 20-10-
807:
(1) A physician, dentist, registered nurse, or physical
therapist who is currently licensed under the laws of this state who provides
home health services only to a patient as a part of his or her private office
practice when the services are incidental to the office practice;
(2) The following healthcare professionals providing home
healthcare services as a sole practitioner:
(A) A registered nurse;
(B) A licensed vocational nurse;
(C) A physical therapist;
*JMB339*
02/24/2025 4:36:30 PM JMB339

HB1585
(D) An occupational therapist;
(E) A speech therapist;
(F) A medical social worker; or
(G) Any other healthcare professional as determined by the
Department of Health;
(3) An entity that solely provides therapy services not
reimbursed under Medicare Part A by healthcare professionals licensed under
§§ 17-93-101 - 17-93-312, § 17-88-101 et seq., or §§ 17-100-102 - 17-100-308;
(4) A nonprofit registry operated by a national or state
professional association or society of licensed healthcare practitioners, or
a subdivision thereof, that operates solely as a clearinghouse to put
consumers in contact with licensed healthcare practitioners who will give
care in a patient's residence and that neither maintains the official patient
records nor directs patient services;
(4)(5) An individual whose permanent residence is in the
patient's residence;
(5)(6) An employee of a person holding a license under this
subchapter who provides home healthcare services only as an employee of the
licensed person and who receives no benefit for providing home healthcare
services other than wages from the employer;
(6)(7) A home, nursing home, convalescent home, or other
institution for individuals with disabilities or individuals who are elderly
that provides health services only to residents of the home or institution;
(7)(8) A person who provides one (1) health service through a
contract with a person licensed;
(8)(9) A durable medical equipment supply company;
(9)(10) A pharmacy or wholesale medical supply company that
furnishes those services that relate to drugs and supplies to persons in
their homes;
(10)(11) A hospital or other licensed healthcare facility
serving only inpatient residents;
(11)(12) A visiting nurse service or home aide service
constructed by and for the adherents of a religious denomination for the
purpose of providing services for those who depend upon spiritual means
through prayer alone for healing; and
(12)(13) Persons providing services to one (1) or more
02/24/2025 4:36:30 PM JMB339

HB1585
individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities, as defined
in § 20-48-101, under a license or certificate from the Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services.

































02/24/2025 4:36:30 PM JMB339